Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.030

Security guidelines—Legislative review—Limitations on permissible ranges of confinement.

(1) The secretary shall submit guidelines pertaining to the nature of the security to be imposed on youth placed in his or her custody based on the age, offense(s), and criminal history of the juvenile offender. Such guidelines shall be submitted to the legislature for its review no later than November 1st of each year. The department shall include security status definitions in the security guidelines it submits to the legislature pursuant to this section.

(2) The permissible ranges of confinement resulting from a finding of manifest injustice under RCW 13.40.0357 are subject to the following limitations:

(a) Where the maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term in the range may be no less than fifty percent of the maximum term in the range;

(b) Where the maximum term in the range is greater than ninety days but not greater than one year, the minimum term in the range may be no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the range; and

(c) Where the maximum term in the range is more than one year, the minimum term in the range may be no less than eighty percent of the maximum term in the range.

[ 2003 c 207 s 5; 1996 c 232 s 5; 1989 c 407 s 3; 1985 c 73 s 1; 1983 c 191 s 6; 1981 c 299 s 5; 1979 c 155 s 55; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 57.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 232: "(1) Sections 1 through 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 28, 1996].

(2) Section 9 of this act takes effect July 1, 1996." [ 1996 c 232 s 12.]

Legislative ratification—1989 c 271: "The legislature ratifies the juvenile disposition standards commission guidelines submitted to the 1989 legislature and endorses the action to increase penalties for juvenile drug offenders." [ 1989 c 271 s 602.]

Effective date—1985 c 73: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 73 s 3.]

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.